Illinois, session 104th, SB2760.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Revenue Sharing Act is amended by 5changing Section 2 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 115/2)  (from Ch. 85, par. 612)7    Sec. 2. Allocation and disbursement. 8    (a) As soon as may be after the first day of each month, 9the Department of Revenue shall allocate among the several 10municipalities and counties of this State the amount available 11in the Local Government Distributive Fund and in the Income 12Tax Surcharge Local Government Distributive Fund, determined 13as provided in Sections 1 and 1a above. Except as provided in 14Sections 13 and 13.1 of this Act, the Department shall then 15certify such allocations to the State Comptroller, who shall 16pay over to the several municipalities and counties the 17respective amounts allocated to them. The amount of such Funds 18allocable to each such municipality and county shall be in 19proportion to the number of individual residents of such 20municipality or county to the total population of the State, 21determined in each case on the basis of the latest census of 22the State, municipality or county conducted by the Federal 23government and certified by the Secretary of State and for   SB2760- 2 -LRB104 16618 HLH 30019 b1annexations to municipalities, the latest Federal, State or 2municipal census of the annexed area which has been certified 3by the Department of Revenue. Allocations to the City of 4Chicago under this Section are subject to Section 6 of the 5Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act. For the purpose of this 6Section, the number of individual residents of a county shall 7be reduced by the number of individuals residing therein in 8municipalities, but the number of individual residents of the 9State, county and municipality shall reflect the latest census 10of any of them. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if 11a municipality imposes fees, surcharges, or other costs for 12the privilege of conducting or participating in sports 13wagering, then the total amount of those fees, surcharges, or 14other costs shall be deducted from that municipality's 15allocation under this subsection and redistributed to the 16other municipalities and counties in this State in accordance 17with the allocation formula set forth in this subsection (a). 18    (b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that 19allocations made under this Section shall be made in a fair and 20equitable manner. Accordingly, the clerk of any municipality 21to which territory has been annexed, or from which territory 22has been disconnected, shall notify the Department of Revenue 23in writing of that annexation or disconnection and shall (1) 24state the number of residents within the territory that was 25annexed or disconnected, based on the last census conducted by 26the federal, State, or municipal government and certified by   SB2760- 3 -LRB104 16618 HLH 30019 b1the Illinois Secretary of State, and (2) furnish therewith a 2certified copy of the plat of annexation or, in the case of 3disconnection, the ordinance, final judgment, or resolution of 4disconnection together with an accurate depiction of the 5territory disconnected. The county in which the annexed or 6disconnected territory is located shall verify that the number 7of residents stated on the written notice that is to be sent to 8the Department of Revenue is true and accurate. The verified 9statement of the county shall accompany the written notice. 10However, if the county does not respond to the municipality's 11request for verification within 30 days, this verification 12requirement shall be waived. The written notice shall be 13provided to the Department of Revenue (1) within 30 days after 14the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 96th General 15Assembly for disconnections occurring after January 1, 2007 16and before the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 1796th General Assembly or (2) within 30 days after the 18annexation or disconnection for annexations or disconnections 19occurring on or after the effective date of this amendatory 20Act of the 96th General Assembly. For purposes of this 21Section, a disconnection or annexation through court order is 22deemed to be effective 30 days after the entry of a final 23judgment order, unless stayed pending appeal. Thereafter, the 24monthly allocation made to the municipality and to any other 25municipality or county affected by the annexation or 26disconnection shall be adjusted in accordance with this   SB2760- 4 -LRB104 16618 HLH 30019 b1Section to reflect the change in residency of the residents of 2the territory that was annexed or disconnected. The adjustment 3shall be made no later than 30 days after the Department of 4Revenue's receipt of the written notice of annexation or 5disconnection described in this Section. 6(Source: P.A. 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.)